Utah statutes.
23-19-17.7.   Wildlife Resources Trust Account created -- Lifetime license
fees deposited -- Disposition of income -- Restriction on use of fund.
(1) There is created within the General Fund a restricted account to be known
as the Wildlife Resources Trust Account. All fees received from the sale of
lifetime licenses shall be deposited in that account.
(2)  All interest earned by investments of the funds in the Wildlife Resources
Trust Account shall, on July 1 of each year, be deposited in the Wildlife
Resources Account created in Section 23-14-13.
(3)  Money in the Wildlife Resources Trust Account is subject to the
restriction in Section 23-22-2 that no money paid to the state for hunting and
fishing license fees shall be diverted for any other purpose than the
enhancement of wildlife by the Division of Wildlife Resources.
